Utah statutes.
76-10-1218.   Qualification for exhibition and distribution of films required.

No person shall distribute any film for exhibition in this state unless that person is first qualified to do so nor exhibit any film in this state which was not acquired for exhibition, directly or indirectly, from a distributor qualified to distribute films in this state.



Enacted by Chapter 93, 1977 General Session

